North Dakota statutes. TITLE 10 Corporations
CHAPTER 10-19.1 North Dakota Business Corporation Act
10-19.1-51.
Director conflicts of interest.

A contract or other transaction between a corporation and:

One or more of its directors or a member of the family of a director;

A director or governor of a related organization, or a member of the family of a director or governor of a related organization; or

An organization in or of which the corporation’s director, or a member of the family of its director, is a director, officer, governor, manager, or representative or has a material financial interest,

The contract or transaction described in subsection 1 is not void or voidable if:

The contract or transaction was, and the person asserting the validity of the contract or transaction was, fair and reasonable as to the corporation at the time it was authorized, approved, or ratified;

The material facts as to the contract or transaction and as to the director’s or directors’ interest are fully disclosed or known to the holders of all outstanding shares, whether or not entitled to vote, and the contract or transaction is approved in good faith by:

The holders of two-thirds of the voting power of the shares entitled to vote which are owned by persons other than the interested director or directors; or

The unanimous affirmative vote of the holder of all outstanding shares, whether or not entitled to vote;

The material facts as to the contract or transaction and as to the director’s or directors’ interest are fully disclosed or known to the board or a committee, and the board or committee authorizes, approves, or ratifies the contract or transaction in good faith by a majority of the directors or committee members currently holding office:

However, the interested director or directors may not vote and are not considered for purposes of a quorum.

If as a result, the number of remaining directors is not sufficient to reach a quorum, then a quorum for the purpose of considering the contract or transaction is the number of remaining directors or committee members, not counting any vote that the interested director might otherwise have in, and not counting the director in determining the presence of a quorum; or

The contract or transaction is a distribution described in subsection 1 of section 10-19.1-92 or a merger or exchange described in subsection 1 or 2 of section 10-19.1-96.

For purposes of this section:

A director does not have a material financial interest in a resolution fixing the compensation of a director or fixing the compensation of another director as a director, officer, employee, or agent of the corporation, is not void or voidable or considered to be a contract or other transaction between a corporation even though the director receiving the compensation fixed by the resolution is present and voting at the meeting of the board or a committee at which the resolution is authorized, approved, or ratified, or even though other directors voting upon the resolution are also receiving compensation from the corporation;

A director has a material financial interest in each organization in which the director, or a member of the family of the director, has a material financial interest; and

A “member of the family” of a director is a spouse, parent, child, child of a spouse, brother, sister, or the spouse of any of these.

The procedures described under subdivisions a, b, and c of subsection 2 are not required if the contract or other transaction is between related organizations.

is not void or voidable because the director or the other individual or organization is a party or because the director is present at the meeting of the shareholders or the board or a committee at which the contract or transaction is authorized, approved, or ratified, if at least one of the requirements of subsection 2 is satisfied.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1993, ch. 54, § 18; 1995, ch. 103, § 16; 1997, ch. 103, § 21; 2001, ch. 112, § 5; 2009, ch. 106, § 12; 2011, ch. 87, § 13.

Collateral References.

Duty of corporate directors to exercise “informed” judgment in recommending responses to merger or tender offers, 46 A.L.R.4th 887.

Law Reviews.

Corporate Governance and Shareholder Rights in a Time of Financial Crisis: How the North Dakota Publicly Traded Corporations Act Changes the Landscape: Article: Director Liability: A Cliche in North Dakota, see 84 N.D. L. Rev. 1109 (2008).

10-19.1-52.
Officers.

The officers of a corporation must be individuals who are eighteen years of age or more, exercising the functions of the offices and:

Must consist of a president, a secretary, and a treasurer, however designated; and

May also include one or more vice presidents and any other officers, however designated, as may be provided in the bylaws.

Unless the articles or the bylaws provide that the shareholders with voting rights may elect the officers:

Each officer must be elected by the board at the time and in the manner as may be provided in the bylaws; or

To the extent authorized in the articles, the bylaws, or a resolution approved by the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors present, the president may appoint one or more officers, other than the treasurer.

Unless otherwise provided, president means chief executive officer and treasurer means chief financial officer.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1997, ch. 103, § 22; 2005, ch. 100, § 11; 2011, ch. 87, § 14.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-49.

10-19.1-53.
Duties of officers and agents.

Unless the articles, bylaws, or a resolution adopted by the board and not inconsistent with the articles or bylaws, provides otherwise, the officers shall have the following duties:

The president shall:

Have general active management for the business of the corporation;

When present, preside at all meetings of the board and of shareholders;

See that all orders and resolutions of the board are carried into effect;

Sign and deliver in the name of the corporation any deeds, mortgages, bonds, contracts, or other instruments pertaining to the business of the corporation, except in cases in which the authority to sign and deliver is required by law to be exercised by another person or is expressly delegated by the articles or bylaws or by the board to some officer or agent of the corporation;

Maintain records of and, whenever necessary, certify all proceedings of the board and the shareholders; and

Perform other duties prescribed by the board.

The vice president, if any, or, if there is more than one, the vice presidents in the order determined by the board, shall:

In the absence or disability of the president, perform the duties and exercise the powers of the president; and

Shall perform other duties and shall have other powers as the board may from time to time prescribe.

The treasurer shall:

Keep accurate financial records for the corporation;

Deposit all money, drafts, and checks in the name of and to the credit of the corporation in the banks and depositories designated by the board;

Endorse for deposit all notes, checks, and drafts received by the corporation as ordered by the board, making proper vouchers;

Disburse corporate funds and issue checks and drafts in the name of the corporation, as ordered by the board;

Give to the president and the board, whenever requested, an account of all transactions by the treasurer and of the financial condition of the corporation; and

Perform other duties prescribed by the board or by the president.

The secretary shall:

Attend all meetings of the board, all meetings of the shareholders, and when required, all meetings of standing committees;

Record all proceedings of the meetings;

Give, or cause to be given, notice of all meetings of the shareholders and meetings of the board; and

Perform other duties prescribed by the board.

All other officers and agents of the corporation, as between themselves and the corporation, have the authority and shall perform the duties in the management of the corporation as may be provided in the articles or bylaws, or as may be determined by resolution of the board not inconsistent with the articles and bylaws.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1995, ch. 103, § 17; 1997, ch. 103, § 23.

Cross-References.

Acts of officer of corporation legalized, see N.D.C.C. § 1-04-02.

Certificate of acknowledgment executed by a corporation, see N.D.C.C. § 47-19-28.

10-19.1-54.
Other officers. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 248.

10-19.1-55.
Multiple offices.

Any number of offices or functions of those offices may be held or exercised by the same individual. If a record must be signed by individuals holding different offices or functions and an individual holds or exercises more than one of those offices or functions, that individual may sign the record in more than one capacity, but only if the record indicates each capacity in which the individual signs.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1997, ch. 103, § 24; 2005, ch. 100, § 12.

10-19.1-56.
Officers deemed elected.

In the absence of an election or appointment of officers by the board, the individual or individuals exercising the functions of the principal officers of the corporation are deemed to have been elected to those offices.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1997, ch. 103, § 25.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-49.

10-19.1-57.
Contract rights.

The election or appointment of an individual as an officer or agent does not, of itself, create contract rights. However, a corporation may enter into a contract with an officer or agent. The resignation or removal of an officer or agent is without prejudice to any contractual rights or obligations. The fact that the contract may be for a term that is longer than the terms of the directors who authorized or approved the contract does not make the contract void or voidable.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1997, ch. 103, § 26.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-50.

10-19.1-58.
Resignation, removal, and vacancies for officers.

An officer may resign at any time by giving written notice to the corporation. The resignation is effective without acceptance when the notice is given to the corporation, unless a later effective date is specified in the notice.

With respect to removal:

Except as otherwise provided in the articles and bylaws, an officer may be removed at any time, with or without cause, by a resolution approved by the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors present, subject to the provisions of a shareholder control agreement.

An officer appointed by the president also may be removed at any time, with or without cause, by the president.

To the extent authorized in the articles, the bylaws, or a resolution approved by the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors present, the president may remove an officer elected or appointed by the board, other than the treasurer.

The articles or the bylaws may provide other manners of removing an officer.

A removal as described in this subsection is without prejudice to any contractual rights of the officer.

A vacancy in an office because of death, resignation, removal, disqualification, or other cause may, or in the case of the president or treasurer must, be filled for the unexpired portion of the term in the manner provided in the articles or bylaws, or determined by the board, or pursuant to section 10-19.1-56.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1997, ch. 103, § 27; 2011, ch. 87, § 15.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-50.

Cross-References.

Removal of directors, see N.D.C.C. § 10-19.1-41.

10-19.1-59.
Delegation by officers.

Unless prohibited by the articles or bylaws or by a resolution adopted by the board, an officer elected or appointed by the board may, without the approval of the board, delegate some or all of the duties and powers of an office to other individuals. An officer who delegates the duties or powers of an office remains subject to the standard of conduct for an officer with respect to the discharge of all duties and powers so delegated.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1997, ch. 103, § 28.

10-19.1-60.
Standard of conduct for officers.

An officer shall discharge the duties of an office in good faith, in a manner the officer reasonably believes to be in the best interests of the corporation, and with the care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances. An individual exercising the principal functions of an office or to whom some or all of the duties and powers of an office are delegated pursuant to section 10-19.1-59 is deemed an officer for purposes of this section and sections 10-19.1-86 and 10-19.1-91.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1997, ch. 103, § 29.

10-19.1-61.
Authorized shares.

Subject to any restrictions in the articles, a corporation may issue securities and rights to purchase securities only when authorized by the board.

All shares of a corporation:

Must be of one class and one series, unless the articles establish or authorize the board to establish more than one class or series;

Must be common shares entitled to vote and have equal rights and preferences in all matters not otherwise provided for by the board, unless and to the extent the articles have created nonvoting shares or have fixed the relative rights and preferences of different classes and series; and

Must have, unless a different par value is specified in the articles, a par value of one cent per share.

Subject to any restrictions in the articles, the power granted in subsection 2 may be exercised by a resolution approved by the directors as required under section 10-19.1-46 establishing a class or series, setting forth the designation of the class or series, and fixing the relative rights and preferences of the class or series.

A statement executed by an officer setting forth the name of the corporation and the text of the resolution and certifying the adoption of the resolution and the date of adoption must be filed with the secretary of state, together with the fees provided under section 10-19.1-147, before the issuance of any shares for which the resolution creates rights or preferences not set forth in the articles. The resolution is effective when the statement is filed with the secretary of state unless the statement specifies a later effective date within thirty days of filing the statement with the secretary of state.

Without limiting the authority granted under this section, a corporation may issue shares of a class or series which:

Are subject to the right of the corporation to redeem any of those shares at the price fixed for the shares’ redemption by the articles or by the board;

Entitle the shareholders to cumulative, partially cumulative, or noncumulative distributions;

Have preference over any class or series of shares for the payment of distributions of any or all kinds;

Convert into shares of any other class or any series of the same or another class; or

Have full, partial, or no voting rights, except as provided under section 10-19.1-20.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1993, ch. 54, § 19; 1995, ch. 103, § 18; 1999, ch. 50, § 12; 1999, ch. 95, § 12; 2007, ch. 101, § 11.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-12, 10-19-13.

Cross-References.

Amendments of articles, limitation of voting rights, see N.D.C.C. § 10-19.1-20.

Annuity, safe deposit, surety and trust companies, capital stock, see N.D.C.C. § 6-05-03.

Banking associations, capital stock and membership, see N.D.C.C. ch. 6-03.

Domestic insurance companies, capital stock, see N.D.C.C. ch. 26.1-05.

Merger or exchange, plan approval, N.D.C.C. § 10-19.1-98.

Power to acquire shares, see N.D.C.C. § 10-19.1-93.

Revocation of dissolution proceedings, see N.D.C.C. § 10-19.1-112.

Voluntary dissolution, limitation of voting rights prohibited, see N.D.C.C. § 10-19.1-107.

10-19.1-61.1.
Share dividends, divisions, and combinations.

A corporation may effect a share dividend or a division or combination of its shares as provided in this section.

Articles of amendment must be adopted by the board and the shareholders under section 10-19.1-19 and, if required, section 10-19.1-20 to effect a division or combination if, as a result of the proposed division or combination:

The rights or preferences of the holders of outstanding shares of any class or series will be adversely affected; or

The percentage of authorized shares of any class or series remaining unissued after the division or combination will exceed the percentage of authorized shares of that class or series that were unissued before the division or combination.

If a division or combination is effected under this section, articles of amendment must be prepared that contain the information required by section 10-19.1-21.

Subject to the restrictions provided in subsections 2 and 3 or any restrictions in the articles that state that this subsection does not apply, a share dividend, division, or combination may be effected by action of the board alone, without the approval of shareholders under sections 10-19.1-19 and 10-19.1-20. In effecting a division or combination under this subsection, the board may amend the articles to increase or decrease the par value of shares, increase or decrease the number of authorized shares, and make any other change necessary or appropriate to assure that the rights or preferences of the holders of outstanding shares of any class or series will not be adversely affected by the division or combination.

If a division or combination that includes an amendment of the articles is effected under subsection 4, articles of amendment must be prepared that contain the information required by section 10-19.1-21 and a statement that the amendment will not adversely affect any right or preference of any holder of outstanding shares of any class or series and will not result in the percentage of authorized shares of any class or series which remains unissued after the division or combination exceeding the percentage of authorized shares of that class or series which were unissued before the division or combination.

For purposes of this section, an increase or decrease in the relative voting rights of the shares that are the subject of the division or combination that arises solely from the increase or decrease in the number of shares outstanding is not an adverse effect on the outstanding shares of any class or series and any increase in the percentage of authorized shares remaining unissued arising solely from the elimination of fractional shares under section 10-19.1-68 must be disregarded.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 54, § 20; 1995, ch. 103, § 19; 1999, ch. 95, § 13; 2001, ch. 112, § 6; 2005, ch. 100, § 13.

10-19.1-62.
Subscriptions for shares.

A subscription for shares, whether made before or after the incorporation of a corporation, is not enforceable against the subscriber unless it is in writing and signed by the subscriber.

Unless otherwise provided in the subscription agreement, or unless all of the subscribers and, if in existence, the corporation consents to a shorter or longer period, a subscription for shares is irrevocable for a period of six months.

A subscription for shares, whether made before or after the incorporation of a corporation, shall be paid in full at the time or times, or in the installments, if any, specified in the subscription agreement. In the absence of a provision in the subscription agreement specifying the time at which the subscription is to be paid, the subscription shall be paid at the time or times determined by the board, but a call made by the board for payment on subscriptions shall be uniform for all shares of the same class or for all shares of the same series.

Unless otherwise provided in the subscription agreement, in the event of default in the payment of an installment or call when due, the corporation may proceed to collect the amount due in the same manner as a debt due the corporation.

If the amount due on a subscription for shares remains unpaid for a period of twenty days after written notice of demand for payment has been given to the delinquent subscriber, the shares subscribed for may be offered for sale by the corporation for a price in money equaling or exceeding the sum of the full balance owed by the delinquent subscriber plus the expenses incidental to the sale. If the shares subscribed for are sold pursuant to this subsection, the corporation shall pay to the delinquent subscriber or to the delinquent subscriber’s legal representative the lesser of:

The excess of net proceeds realized by the corporation over the sum of the amount owed by the delinquent subscriber plus the expenses incidental to the sale; and

The amount actually paid by the delinquent subscriber.

If the amount due on a subscription for shares remains unpaid for a period of twenty days after written notice of demand for payment has been given to the delinquent subscriber and the shares subscribed for by the delinquent subscriber have not been sold pursuant to subsection 5, the corporation may cancel the subscription, in which event the shares subscribed for must be restored to the status of authorized but unissued shares, the corporation may retain the portion of the subscription price actually paid that does not exceed ten percent of the subscription price, and the corporation shall refund to the delinquent subscriber or the delinquent subscriber’s legal representative that portion of the subscription price actually paid which exceeds ten percent of the subscription price.

If the shares subscribed for are not sold pursuant to this subsection, the corporation may collect the amount due in the same manner as a debt due the corporation or cancel the subscription in accordance with subsection 6.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1995, ch. 103, § 20.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-14.

10-19.1-63.
Consideration for shares — Value and payment — Liability.

Consideration for the issuance of shares may be paid, in whole or in part, in money; in other property, tangible or intangible; or in labor or services actually performed for the corporation. When payment of the consideration for which shares are to be issued is received by the corporation, the shares are considered fully paid and nonassessable. Neither promissory notes nor future services constitute payment or part payment for shares of a corporation.

Subject to any restrictions in the articles, a corporation may, without any new or additional consideration, issue its own shares in exchange for or in conversion of its outstanding shares, or, subject to authorization of share dividends, divisions, and combinations according to section 10-19.1-61.1, issue its own shares pro rata to shareholders or the shareholders of one or more classes or series, to effectuate share dividends, divisions, or combinations. No shares of a class or series, shares of which are then outstanding, shall be issued to the holders of shares of another class or series, except in exchange for or in conversion of outstanding shares of the other class or series, unless the issuance is expressly provided for in the articles or is approved at a meeting by the affirmative vote of the holders of a majority of the voting power of all shares of the same class or series as the shares to be issued.

The determinations of the board or the shareholders as to the amount or fair value or the fairness to the corporation of the consideration received or to be received by the corporation for its shares or the terms of payment, as well as the agreement to issue shares for that consideration, are presumed to be proper if they are made in good faith and on the basis of accounting methods, or a fair valuation or other method, reasonable in the circumstances. Unless otherwise required by the articles, the consideration may be less than the par value, if any, of the shares. Directors or shareholders who are present and entitled to vote, and who, intentionally or without reasonable investigation, fail to vote against approving an issue of shares for a consideration that is unfair to the corporation, or overvalue property received or to be received by the corporation as consideration for shares issued, are jointly and severally liable to the corporation for the benefit of the then shareholders who did not consent to and are damaged by the action, to the extent of the damages of those shareholders. A director or shareholder against whom a claim is asserted pursuant to this subsection, except in case of knowing participation in a deliberate fraud, is entitled to contribution on an equitable basis from other directors or shareholders who are liable under this section.

A corporation may issue only shares that are nonassessable or that are assessable but are issued with the unanimous consent of the shareholders. “Nonassessable” shares are shares for which the agreed consideration has been fully paid, delivered, or rendered to the corporation.

The reasonable charges and expenses of organization or reorganization of a corporation, and the reasonable expenses of and compensation for the sale or underwriting of its shares, may be paid or allowed by the corporation out of the consideration received by it in payment for its shares without rendering the shares not fully paid and nonassessable.

If shares are issued in violation of this subsection, then the following persons are jointly and severally liable to the corporation for the difference between the agreed consideration for the shares and the consideration actually received by the corporation:

A director or shareholder who was present and entitled to vote but who failed to vote against the issuance of the shares knowing of the violation;

The person to whom the shares were issued; and

A successor or transferee of the interest in the corporation of a person described in paragraph 1 or 2, including a purchaser of shares, a subsequent assignee, successor, or transferee, a pledgee, a holder of any other security interest in the assets of the corporation or shares granted by the person described in paragraph 1 or 2, or a legal representative of or for the person or estate of the person, which successor, transferee, purchaser, assignee, pledgee, holder, or representative acquired the interest knowing of the violation.

A pledgee or holder of any other security interest in all or any shares that have been issued in violation of subsection 4 is not liable under subdivision b of subsection 4 if all those shares are surrendered to the corporation. The surrender does not impair any rights of the pledgee or holder of any other security interest against the pledgor or person granting the security interest.

A pledgee, holder of any other security interest, or legal representative is liable under subdivision b of subsection 4 only in that capacity. The liability of the person under subdivision a of subsection 4 is limited to the assets held in that capacity for the person or estate of the person described in paragraph 1 or 2 of subdivision b of subsection 4.

Each person liable under subdivision b of subsection 4 has a full right of contribution on an equitable basis from all other persons liable under that subdivision for the same transaction.

An action may not be maintained against a person under subdivision b of subsection 4 unless commenced within two years from the date on which shares are issued in violation of subsection 4.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1993, ch. 54, § 21; 1999, ch. 95, § 14; 2003 ch. 85, § 9; 2003 Sp., ch. 670, § 1; 2005, ch. 100, § 14; 2007, ch. 101, § 12.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-15, 10-19-16.

Cross-References.

Authority to make distributions, see N.D.C.C. § 10-19.1-92.

10-19.1-64.
Rights to purchase.

“Right to purchase” means the right, however designated, pursuant to the terms of a security or agreement, entitling a person to subscribe to, purchase, or acquire securities of a corporation, whether by the exchange or conversion of other securities, or by the exercise of options, warrants, or other rights, or otherwise, but excluding pre-emptive rights.

Rights to purchase may be either transferable or nontransferable and either separable or inseparable from other securities of the corporation, as the board may determine under this section.

A corporation may issue rights to purchase after the terms, provisions, and conditions of the rights to purchase to be issued, including the conversion basis or the price at which securities may be purchased or subscribed for, are fixed by the board or by an officer pursuant to board authorization, subject to any restrictions in the articles.

The instrument or written agreement evidencing the right to purchase must set forth in full, summarize, or incorporate by reference all the terms, provisions, and conditions applicable to the right to purchase.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1993, ch. 54, § 22; 1999, ch. 95, § 15; 2001, ch. 112, § 7.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-17.

Collateral References.

Validity of stock option plan under which selected personnel of corporation may acquire stock interest therein, 34 A.L.R.2d 852.

Who is “employee” under stock option plan or contract, 57 A.L.R.3d 787.

Sufficiency of consideration for employee stock option contract, 57 A.L.R.3d 1241.

Construction and effect of “dilution” provision of employee’s stock option contract, dealing with rights where stock structure of corporation changes before option is exercised, 59 A.L.R.3d 1030.

10-19.1-65.
Pre-emptive rights.

Unless denied or limited in the articles or by the board pursuant to subdivision b of subsection 2 of section 10-19.1-61, a shareholder of a corporation has the pre-emptive rights provided in this section.

A pre-emptive right is the right of a shareholder to acquire a certain fraction of the unissued securities or rights to purchase securities of a corporation before the corporation may offer them to other persons.

A shareholder has a pre-emptive right whenever the corporation proposes to issue new or additional shares or rights to purchase shares of the same class or series as the series held by the shareholder or, if a class of shares has no series, the same class as the class held by the shareholder, new or additional securities other than shares, or rights to purchase securities other than shares, that are exchangeable for, convertible into, or carry a right to acquire new or additional shares of the same class or series as those held by the shareholder or, if a class of shares has no series, the same class as the class held by the shareholder.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles, a shareholder does not have a pre-emptive right pursuant to this section to acquire securities or rights to purchase securities that are:

Issued for a consideration other than money;

Issued pursuant to a plan of merger or exchange;

Issued pursuant to an employee or incentive benefit plan approved at a meeting by the affirmative vote of the holders of a majority of the voting power of all shares entitled to vote;

Issued upon exercise of previously issued rights to purchase securities of the corporation;

Issued pursuant to a public offering of the corporation’s securities or rights to purchase securities. For purposes of this subdivision, “public offering” means an offering of the corporation’s securities or rights to purchase securities if the resale or other distribution of those securities or rights to purchase securities is not restricted by either state or federal securities laws; or

Issued pursuant to a plan of reorganization approved by a court of competent jurisdiction pursuant to a statute of this state or of the United States.

The fraction of the new issue that each shareholder may acquire by exercise of a pre-emptive right is the ratio that the number of shares of that class or series owned by the shareholder before the new issue bears to the total number of shares of that class or series issued and outstanding before the new issue.

A shareholder may waive a pre-emptive right in writing. The waiver is binding upon the shareholder whether or not consideration has been given for the waiver. Unless otherwise provided in the waiver, a waiver of pre-emptive rights is effective only for the proposed issuance described in the waiver.

When proposing the issuance of securities with respect to which shareholders have pre-emptive rights under this section, the board shall cause notice to be given to each shareholder entitled to pre-emptive rights. The notice must be given at least ten days before the date by which the shareholder must exercise a pre-emptive right and must contain:

The number or amount of securities with respect to which the shareholder has a pre-emptive right and the method used to determine that number or amount;

The price and other terms and conditions upon which the shareholder may purchase them; and

The time within which and the method by which the shareholder must exercise the right.

Securities that are subject to pre-emptive rights but not acquired by shareholders in the exercise of those rights may, for a period not exceeding one year after the date fixed by the board for the exercise of those pre-emptive rights, be issued to persons the board determines, at a price not less than, and on terms no more favorable to the purchaser than, those offered to the shareholders. Securities that are not issued during that one-year period shall, at the expiration of the period, again become subject to pre-emptive rights of shareholders.

If the shareholders of a corporation are entitled to cumulative voting in the election of directors, no amendment to the articles which has the effect of denying, limiting, or modifying the pre-emptive rights provided in this section may be adopted if the votes of a proportion of the voting power sufficient to elect a director at an election of the entire board under cumulative voting are cast against the amendment.

A denial or limitation of pre-emptive rights otherwise provided under this section does not limit the power of the corporation to grant first refusal rights or other rights to purchase from the corporation shares or other securities of the corporation to shareholders, subscribers, or other persons before the shares or other securities are offered to or acquired by any other person.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1993, ch. 54, § 23; 1995, ch. 103, § 21; 1999, ch. 95, § 16; 2007, ch. 101, § 13.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-24.

Collateral References.

Validity of stock option plan under which selected personnel of corporation may acquire stock interest therein, 34 A.L.R.2d 852.

10-19.1-66.
Share certificates — Issuance and contents — Uncertificated shares.

The shares of a corporation must be certificated shares or uncertificated shares. Each holder of certificated shares issued in compliance with section 10-19.1-63 is entitled to a certificate of shares.

The shares of a corporation must be represented by certificates signed by the president or a vice president, and by the secretary, or by an assistant secretary of the corporation.

If a person signs or has a facsimile signature placed upon a certificate while an officer, transfer agent, or registrar of a corporation, the certificate may be issued by the corporation even if the person ceases having that capacity before the certificate is issued, with the same effect as if the person had that capacity at the date of the certificate’s issue.

Every certificate representing shares issued by a corporation that is authorized to issue shares of more than one class must set forth upon the face or back of the certificate, or must state that the corporation will furnish to any shareholders upon request and without charge, a full or summary statement of the designations, preferences, limitations, and relative rights of the shares of each class authorized to be issued and, if the corporation is authorized to issue any preferred or special class or series, the variations in the relative rights and preferences between the shares of each of the series to the extent the relative rights and preferences have been fixed and determined and the authority of the board to fix and determine the relative rights and preferences of subsequent series. Each certificate representing shares must state upon its face:

The name of the corporation.

That the corporation is organized under the laws of this state.

The name of the person to whom issued.

The number and class of shares and the designation of the series, if any, the certificate represents.

The par value of any share represented by the certificate or a statement the shares are without par value.

A certificate signed as provided under subsection 1 is prima facie evidence of the ownership of the shares referred to in the certificate.

Unless uncertificated shares are prohibited by the articles or bylaws, a corporation may provide that some or all of any or all classes and series of the corporation’s shares will be uncertificated shares.

The action by the corporation provided in this subsection does not apply to shares represented by a certificate until the certificate is surrendered to the corporation.

Within a reasonable time after the issuance or transfer of uncertificated shares, the corporation shall give to the new shareholder the information required by this section to be stated on certificates.

The information required under this section is not required to be given to the new shareholder by a publicly held corporation that adopted a system of issuance, recordation, and transfer of the corporation’s shares by electronic or other means not involving the issuance of certificates if the system complies with federal law.

Except as otherwise expressly provided by statute, the rights and obligations of the holders of certificated and uncertificated shares of the same class and series are identical.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1997, ch. 103, § 30; 1999, ch. 95, § 17; 2007, ch. 101, § 14; 2019, ch. 94, § 7, effective August 1, 2019.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-20.

Cross-References.

Payment for shares, promissory notes and future services not constituting, see N.D.C.C. § 10-19.1-63.

Collateral References.

Delivery: corporation’s delivery of stock certificate to stockholder as prerequisite to its issuance to him, 16 A.L.R.3d 1015.

10-19.1-67.
Lost share certificates — Replacement.

A new share certificate may be issued pursuant to section 41-08-38 in place of one that is alleged to have been lost, stolen, or destroyed.

The issuance of a new certificate under this section does not constitute an overissue of the shares it represents.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1997, ch. 362, § 1.